Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.30.060

Picture of candidate. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

At least one picture of the candidate used in any political advertising shall have been taken within the last five years and shall be no smaller than any other picture of the same candidate used in the same advertisement.

[ 2024 c 164 s 438; 2010 c 204 s 506; 1984 c 216 s 2. Formerly RCW 42.17A.330, 42.17.520.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.